Nevada, session 83, SB74.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 1.3. Chapter 293 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 1.4 and 1.6 of this act.
Sec. 1.4. “Current and valid” means that a document is not
expired at the time it is presented and:
1. Is issued by an appropriate entity; and
2. Represents the person whose identity or personal
information the document is being presented to identify or
confirm.
Sec. 1.5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 1.6. 1. If an active registered voter who is eligible to
receive a mail ballot pursuant to NRS 293.269911, including,
without limitation, an active registered voter who has elected not
-
*SB74_R4*

– 7 –
to receive a mail ballot pursuant to NRS 293.269911, is unable to
access his or her mail ballot or appear in person at the polls due to
an emergency, the voter may submit a request to the county clerk,
not earlier than the 46th day before an election and not later than
the day before the election, to receive a mail ballot.
2. Upon receiving a request pursuant to subsection 1, the
county clerk shall, after verifying the voter is eligible to receive a
mail ballot pursuant to NRS 293.269911 and has not already voted
in the election, distribute the mail ballot to the voter.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this section, all provisions
of this title relating to mail ballots apply to a mail ballot requested
and distributed pursuant to this section.
4. The Secretary of State shall adopt regulations to carry out
the provisions of this section.
5. For the purposes of this section, “emergency” means an
unforeseen circumstance which significantly impairs the ability of
an active registered voter to access his or her mail ballot or appear
in person at the polls, including, without limitation:
(a) An illness or disability resulting in confinement in a
hospital, sanatorium, dwelling or nursing home;
(b) A sudden hospitalization, serious illness or call away from
home; or
(c) Any other circumstance the Secretary of State determines
by regulation to constitute an emergency for the purposes of this
section.
Sec. 1.7. NRS 293.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.010 As used in this title, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 293.016 to 293.121,
inclusive, and section 1.4 of this act have the meanings ascribed to
them in those sections.
Sec. 1.9. NRS 293.0653 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.0653 “Mail ballot” means a mail ballot distributed to an
active registered voter pursuant to the provisions of NRS
293.269911 to 293.269937, inclusive, and section 1.6 of this act
and NRS 293C.263 to 293C.26337, inclusive [.] and section 28.3 of
this act.
Sec. 2. NRS 293.176 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.176 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, no
person may be a candidate of a major political party for partisan
office in any election if the person has changed:
(a) The designation of his or her political party affiliation; or
(b) His or her designation of political party from nonpartisan to
a designation of a political party affiliation,
 on an application to register to vote in the State of Nevada [or in
any other state] during the time beginning on December 31
-
*SB74_R4*

– 8 –
preceding the closing filing date for that election and ending on the
date of that election whether or not the person’s previous
registration was still effective at the time of the change in party
designation.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to any person
who is a candidate of a political party that is not organized pursuant
to NRS 293.171 on the December 31 next preceding the closing
filing date for the election.
Sec. 3. NRS 293.177 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.177 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.165
and 293.166, a name may not be printed on a ballot to be used at a
primary election unless the person named has filed a declaration of
candidacy with the appropriate filing officer and paid the filing fee
required by NRS 293.193 not earlier than:
(a) For a candidate for judicial office, the first Monday in
January of the year in which the election is to be held and not later
than 5 p.m. on the second Friday after the first Monday in January;
and
(b) For all other candidates, the first Monday in March of the
year in which the election is to be held and not later than 5 p.m. on
the second Friday after the first Monday in March.
2. A declaration of candidacy required to be filed pursuant to
this chapter must be in substantially the following form:
(a) For partisan office:

DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY OF ........ FOR THE
OFFICE OF ................

State of Nevada

County of ........................

For the purpose of having my name placed on the official
ballot as a candidate for the ................ Party nomination for
the office of ........., I, the undersigned ........, do swear or
affirm under penalty of perjury that I actually, as opposed to
constructively, reside at .........., in the City or Town of .......,
County of .........., State of Nevada; that my actual, as opposed
to constructive, residence in the State, district, county,
township, city or other area prescribed by law to which the
office pertains began on a date at least 30 days immediately
preceding the date of the close of filing of declarations of
candidacy for this office; that my telephone number is
............, and the address at which I receive mail, if different
than my residence, is .........; that I am registered as a member
-
*SB74_R4*

– 9 –
of the ................ Party; that I am a qualified elector pursuant
to Section 1 of Article 2 of the Constitution of the State of
Nevada; that if I have ever been convicted of treason or a
felony, my civil rights have been restored; that I have not, in
violation of the provisions of NRS 293.176, changed the
designation of my political party or political party affiliation
on an official application to register to vote in any state since
December 31 before the closing filing date for this election;
that I generally believe in and intend to support the concepts
found in the principles and policies of that political party in
the coming election; that if nominated as a candidate of the
................ Party at the ensuing election, I will accept that
nomination and not withdraw; that I will not knowingly
violate any election law or any law defining and prohibiting
corrupt and fraudulent practices in campaigns and elections in
this State; that I will qualify for the office if elected thereto,
including, but not limited to, complying with any limitation
prescribed by the Constitution and laws of this State
concerning the number of years or terms for which a person
may hold the office; that I understand that knowingly and
willfully filing a declaration of candidacy which contains a
false statement is a crime punishable as a gross misdemeanor
and also subjects me to a civil action disqualifying me from
entering upon the duties of the office; and that I understand
that my name will appear on all ballots as designated in this
declaration.

.............................................................
(Designation of name)

.............................................................
(Signature of candidate for office)

Subscribed and sworn to before me
this ...... day of the month of ...... of the year ......

............................................................
Notary Public or other person
authorized to administer an oath

(b) For an independent candidate for partisan office:
-
*SB74_R4*

– 10 –
DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY OF ........ FOR THE
OFFICE OF ................

State of Nevada

County of ........................

For the purpose of having my name placed on the official
ballot at the general election as an independent candidate
for the office of ........., I, the undersigned ........, do swear or
affirm under penalty of perjury that I actually, as opposed
to constructively, reside at .........., in the City or Town of
......., County of .........., State of Nevada; that my actual, as
opposed to constructive, residence in the State, district,
county, township, city or other area prescribed by law to
which the office pertains began on a date at least 30 days
immediately preceding the date of the close of filing of
declarations of candidacy for this office; that my telephone
number is ............, and the address at which I receive mail,
if different than my residence, is .........; that I am a qualified
elector pursuant to Section 1 of Article 2 of the Constitution
of the State of Nevada; that if I have ever been convicted of
treason or a felony, my civil rights have been restored; that I
will not knowingly violate any election law or any law
defining and prohibiting corrupt and fraudulent practices in
campaigns and elections in this State; that I will qualify for
the office if elected thereto, including, but not limited to,
complying with any limitation prescribed by the
Constitution and laws of this State concerning the number
of years or terms for which a person may hold the office;
that I understand that knowingly and willfully filing a
declaration of candidacy which contains a false statement is
a crime punishable as a gross misdemeanor and also
subjects me to a civil action disqualifying me from entering
upon the duties of the office; and that I understand that my
name will appear on all ballots as designated in this
declaration.

.............................................................
(Designation of name)

.............................................................
(Signature of candidate for office)
-
*SB74_R4*

– 11 –
Subscribed and sworn to before me
this ...... day of the month of ...... of the year ......

............................................................
Notary Public or other person
authorized to administer an oath

(c) For nonpartisan office:

DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY OF ........ FOR THE
OFFICE OF ................

State of Nevada

County of ........................

For the purpose of having my name placed on the official
ballot as a candidate for the office of ................, I, the
undersigned ................, do swear or affirm under penalty of
perjury that I actually, as opposed to constructively, reside at
........., in the City or Town of ......., County of ........., State of
Nevada; that my actual, as opposed to constructive, residence
in the State, district, county, township, city or other area
prescribed by law to which the office pertains began on a date
at least 30 days immediately preceding the date of the close
of filing of declarations of candidacy for this office; that my
telephone number is ..........., and the address at which I
receive mail, if different than my residence, is ..........; that I
am a qualified elector pursuant to Section 1 of Article 2 of the
Constitution of the State of Nevada; that if I have ever been
convicted of treason or a felony, my civil rights have been
restored; that if nominated as a nonpartisan candidate at the
ensuing election, I will accept the nomination and not
withdraw; that I will not knowingly violate any election law
or any law defining and prohibiting corrupt and fraudulent
practices in campaigns and elections in this State; that I will
qualify for the office if elected thereto, including, but not
limited to, complying with any limitation prescribed by the
Constitution and laws of this State concerning the number of
years or terms for which a person may hold the office; that I
understand that knowingly and willfully filing a declaration
of candidacy which contains a false statement is a crime
punishable as a gross misdemeanor and also subjects me to a
civil action disqualifying me from entering upon the duties of
-
*SB74_R4*

– 12 –
the office; and that I understand that my name will appear on
all ballots as designated in this declaration.

.............................................................
(Designation of name)

.............................................................
(Signature of candidate for office)

Subscribed and sworn to before me
this ...... day of the month of ...... of the year ......

............................................................
Notary Public or other person
authorized to administer an oath

3. The address of a candidate which must be included in the
declaration of candidacy pursuant to subsection 2 must be the street
address of the residence where the candidate actually, as opposed to
constructively, resides in accordance with NRS 281.050, if one has
been assigned. The declaration of candidacy must not be accepted
for filing if the candidate fails to comply with the following
provisions of this subsection or, if applicable, the provisions of
subsection 4:
(a) The candidate shall not list the candidate’s address as a post
office box unless a street address has not been assigned to his or her
residence; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, the candidate
shall present to the filing officer:
(1) A valid driver’s license or identification card issued by a
governmental agency that contains a photograph of the candidate
and the candidate’s residential address; or
(2) A current utility bill, bank statement, paycheck, or
document issued by a governmental entity, including a check which
indicates the candidate’s name and residential address, but not
including a voter registration card.
4. If the candidate executes an oath or affirmation under
penalty of perjury stating that the candidate is unable to present to
the filing officer the proof of residency required by subsection 3
because a street address has not been assigned to the candidate’s
residence or because the rural or remote location of the candidate’s
residence makes it impracticable to present the proof of residency
required by subsection 3, the candidate shall present to the filing
officer:
-
*SB74_R4*

– 13 –
(a) A valid driver’s license or identification card issued by a
governmental agency that contains a photograph of the candidate;
and
(b) Alternative proof of the candidate’s residential address that
the filing officer determines is sufficient to verify where the
candidate actually, as opposed to constructively, resides in
accordance with NRS 281.050. The Secretary of State may adopt
regulations establishing the forms of alternative proof of the
candidate’s residential address that the filing officer may accept to
verify where the candidate actually, as opposed to constructively,
resides in accordance with NRS 281.050.
5. The filing officer shall retain a copy of the proof of identity
and residency provided by the candidate pursuant to subsection 3 or
4. Such a copy:
(a) May not be withheld from the public; and
(b) Must not contain the social security number, driver’s license
or identification card number or account number of the candidate.
6. By filing the declaration of candidacy, the candidate shall be
deemed to have appointed the filing officer for the office as his or
her agent for service of process for the purposes of a proceeding
pursuant to NRS 293.182. Service of such process must first be
attempted at the appropriate address as specified by the candidate in
the declaration of candidacy. If the candidate cannot be served at
that address, service must be made by personally delivering to and
leaving with the filing officer duplicate copies of the process. The
filing officer shall immediately send, by registered or certified mail,
one of the copies to the candidate at the specified address, unless the
candidate has designated in writing to the filing officer a different
address for that purpose, in which case the filing officer shall mail
the copy to the last address so designated.
7. If the filing officer receives credible evidence indicating that
a candidate has been convicted of a felony and has not had his or her
civil rights restored, the filing officer:
(a) May conduct an investigation to determine whether the
candidate has been convicted of a felony and, if so, whether the
candidate has had his or her civil rights restored; and
(b) Shall transmit the credible evidence and the findings from
such investigation to the Attorney General, if the filing officer is the
Secretary of State, or to the district attorney, if the filing officer is a
person other than the Secretary of State.
8. The receipt of information by the Attorney General or
district attorney pursuant to subsection 7 must be treated as a
challenge of a candidate pursuant to subsections 4 and 5 of NRS
293.182 to which the provisions of NRS 293.2045 apply.
-
*SB74_R4*

– 14 –
9. Any person who knowingly and willfully files a declaration
of candidacy which contains a false statement in violation of this
section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
Sec. 4. NRS 293.193 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.193 1. Fees as listed in this section for filing declarations
of candidacy must be paid to the filing officer by cash, cashier’s
check , [or] certified check [.] or, if accepted by the filing officer,
credit card.

United States Senator ....................................................... $500
Representative in Congress ................................................ 300
Governor ............................................................................. 300
Justice of the Supreme Court .............................................. 300
[Any state office, other than Governor or justice
of the Supreme Court ................................................... 200]
Independent candidate for the office of
President of the United States ...................................... 250
Lieutenant Governor ......................................................... 200
Secretary of State, State Treasurer, State
Controller or Attorney General .................................... 200
Judge of the Court of Appeals ........................................... 200
Member of the State Board of Education ......................... 200
District judge ...................................................................... 150
Justice of the peace ............................................................. 100
Any county office ............................................................... 100
State Senator ....................................................................... 100
Assemblyman or Assemblywoman .................................... 100
Trustee of a county school district, hospital or
hospital district ............................................................... 30
Any other district office other than district judge ................ 30
Constable or other town or township office ......................... 30
Member of the Board of Regents of the
University of Nevada ........................................................ 0
Any other office which receives no
compensation .................................................................... 0

For the purposes of this subsection, trustee of a county school
district, hospital or hospital district is not a county office.
2. No filing fee may be required from a candidate for an office
the holder of which receives no compensation.
3. The county clerk shall pay to the county treasurer all filing
fees received from candidates. The county treasurer shall deposit the
money to the credit of the general fund of the county.
4. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.194, a filing fee
paid pursuant to this section is not refundable.
-
*SB74_R4*

– 15 –
Sec. 5. NRS 293.200 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.200 1. An independent candidate for partisan office must
file with the appropriate filing officer as set forth in NRS 293.185:
(a) A copy of the petition of candidacy that he or she intends to
subsequently circulate for signatures. The copy must be filed not
earlier than the January 2 preceding the date of the election and not
later than 10 working days before the last day to file the petition
pursuant to subsection 4. The copy of the petition must be filed with
the appropriate filing officer before the petition may be circulated
for signatures.
(b) Either of the following:
(1) A petition of candidacy signed by a number of registered
voters equal to at least 1 percent of the total number of ballots cast
in:
(I) This State for that office at the last preceding general
election in which a person was elected to that office, if the office is a
statewide office;
(II) The county for that office at the last preceding general
election in which a person was elected to that office, if the office is a
county office; or
(III) The district for that office at the last preceding
general election in which a person was elected to that office, if the
office is a district office.
(2) A petition of candidacy signed by 250 registered voters if
the candidate is a candidate for statewide office, or signed by 100
registered voters if the candidate is a candidate for any office other
than a statewide office.
2. The petition may consist of more than one document. Each
document must bear the name of the county in which it was
circulated, and only registered voters of that county may sign the
document. If the office is not a statewide office, only the registered
voters of the county, district or municipality in question may sign
the document. The documents that are circulated for signature in a
county must be submitted to that county clerk for verification in the
manner prescribed in NRS 293.1276 to 293.1279, inclusive, not
later than 10 working days before the last day to file the petition
pursuant to subsection 4. Each person who signs the petition shall
add to his or her signature the address of the place at which the
person actually resides, the date that he or she signs the petition and
the name of the county where he or she is registered to vote. The
person who circulates each document of the petition shall sign an
affidavit attesting that the signatures on the document are genuine to
the best of his or her knowledge and belief and were signed in his or
her presence by persons registered to vote in that county.
-
*SB74_R4*

– 16 –
3. The petition of candidacy may state the principle, if any,
which the person qualified represents.
4. Petitions of candidacy must be filed not earlier than the first
Monday in March preceding the general election and not later than 5
p.m. on the third Friday in June.
5. No petition of candidacy may contain the name of more than
one candidate for each office to be filled.
6. A person may not file as an independent candidate if he or
she is proposing to run as the candidate of a political party.
7. The names of independent candidates must be placed on the
general election ballot and must not appear on the primary election
ballot.
8. If the sufficiency of the petition of the candidacy of any
person seeking to qualify pursuant to this section is challenged, all
affidavits and documents in support of the challenge must be filed
not later than 5 p.m. on the fourth Friday in June. Any judicial
proceeding resulting from the challenge must be set for hearing not
more than 5 days after the fourth Friday in June.
9. Any challenge pursuant to subsection 8 must be filed with:
(a) The First Judicial District Court if the petition of candidacy
was filed with the Secretary of State.
(b) The district court for the county where the petition of
candidacy was filed if the petition was filed with a county clerk.
10. The district court in which the challenge is filed shall give
priority to such proceedings over all other matters pending with the
court, except for criminal proceedings.
11. An independent candidate for partisan office must file a
declaration of candidacy in the form required by NRS 293.177 with
the appropriate filing officer and pay the filing fee required by NRS
293.193 not earlier than the first Monday in March of the year in
which the election is held and not later than 5 p.m. on the second
Friday after the first Monday in March.
Sec. 6. NRS 293.203 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.203 Immediately upon receipt by the county clerk of the
certified list of candidates for judicial and nonjudicial office from
the Secretary of State pursuant to NRS 293.187, the county clerk
shall publish a notice of primary election or general election in a
newspaper of general circulation in the county once a week for 2
successive weeks. If no such newspaper is published in the county,
the publication may be made in a newspaper of general circulation
published in the nearest Nevada county. The notice must contain:
1. The date of the election.
2. The location of the polling places.
3. The hours during which the polling places will be open for
voting.
-
*SB74_R4*

– 17 –
4. The name of each candidate.
5. The office which each candidate is seeking to be elected to
and if the office is partisan, the party with which the candidate is
affiliated.
 The notice required for a general election pursuant to this section
may be published in conjunction with the notice required for a
proposed constitution or constitutional amendment pursuant to NRS
293.253. If the notices are combined in this manner, they must be
published three times in accordance with subsection 3 of
NRS 293.253.
Sec. 7. NRS 293.2175 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.2175 1. The county clerk may appoint a pupil as a
trainee for the position of election board officer. To qualify for such
an appointment, the pupil must be:
(a) A United States citizen, a resident of Nevada and a resident
of the county in which the pupil serves;
(b) Enrolled in high school; and
(c) At the time of service, at least 16 years of age.
2. The county clerk may only appoint a pupil as a trainee if:
(a) The pupil is appointed without political party affiliation;
(b) The county clerk sends the pupil a certificate stating the date
and hours that the pupil will act as a trainee;
(c) At least 20 days before the election in which the pupil will
act as a trainee, the principal of the high school or the pupil’s
assigned school counselor receives the county clerk’s certificate and
a written request signed by the pupil’s parent or guardian to be
excused from school for the time specified in the certificate;
(d) The principal of the high school or the assigned school
counselor of the pupil approves the pupil’s request; and
(e) The pupil attends the training class required by
NRS 293B.260.
3. A pupil may be appointed as a trainee pursuant to this
section regardless of his or her affiliation with a political party
including, without limitation, any designation of party affiliation
on his or her application to preregister or register to vote.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the county
clerk may assign a trainee such duties as the county clerk deems
appropriate. The county clerk shall not require the trainee to perform
those duties later than 10 p.m. or any applicable curfew, whichever
is earlier.
[4.] 5. The county clerk may compensate a trainee for service
at the same rate fixed for election board officers generally.
-
*SB74_R4*

– 18 –
Sec. 8. NRS 293.225 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.225 1. Members of election boards continue to serve as
such from the day [before the day of the election,] of appointment
until the time for filing contests of the election has expired.
2. Each member of an election board is subject to call by the
board of county commissioners or city council to correct any errors
discovered during the canvass of votes by the board of county
commissioners or city council.
3. Reserve election board officers must be appointed by the
county or city clerk, if practicable, to fill any vacancy which occurs
on the day of the election, and the reserve officers must be
compensated if they serve at the polls.
4. If a vacancy occurs in any election board on the day of the
election and no reserves are available, the election board may
appoint, at the polling place, any registered voter who is willing to
serve and satisfies the election board that he or she possesses the
qualifications required to perform the services required.
Sec. 8.5. NRS 293.2504 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.2504 1. The Secretary of State shall develop and provide
a training course to each county clerk and city clerk related to
elections procedures, including, without limitation, the procedures
set forth in the elections procedures manual required pursuant to
NRS 293.2502.
2. Each county clerk and city clerk shall attend the training
course provided by the Secretary of State.
3. A county clerk or city clerk may require any deputy or
employee of the office of the county or city clerk whose duties
relate to elections to attend a training course provided by the
Secretary of State pursuant to this section.
4. The Secretary of State:
(a) Shall provide to or reimburse the county or city, as
applicable, the following costs for a county or city clerk to attend
the training course required pursuant to this section:
(1) The cost of the per diem allowance or the cost of meals
which are contracted for with a vendor that was procured through
a competitive bidding process;
(2) Incidentals; and [travel]
(3) Travel expenses ; [of the county clerk or city clerk for
attending the training course required pursuant to this section. Any
reimbursement must be paid from the Reserve for Statutory
Contingency Account upon recommendation by the Secretary of
State and approval by the State Board of Examiners.] and
(b) May provide to or reimburse the county or city, as
applicable, [for] the following costs for any deputy or employee of
-
*SB74_R4*

– 19 –
the office of the county clerk or city clerk who attends the training
course required pursuant to this section:
(1) The cost of the per diem allowance or the cost of meals
which are contracted for with a vendor that was procured through
a competitive bidding process;
(2) Incidentals; and [travel]
(3) Travel expenses . [of any deputy or employee of the
office of the county or city clerk for attending the training course
required pursuant to this section.]
 Any reimbursement must be paid from the Reserve for Statutory
Contingency Account upon recommendation by the Secretary of
State and approval by the State Board of Examiners.
Sec. 9. NRS 293.260 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.260 1. If there is no contest of election for nomination to
a particular office, neither the title of the office nor the name of the
candidate may appear on the ballot at the primary election.
2. If a major political party has two or more candidates for a
particular office, the person who receives the highest number of
votes at the primary election must be declared the nominee of that
major political party for the office.
3. If not more than the number of candidates to be elected have
filed for nomination for:
(a) Any partisan office or the office of judge of a district court,
judge of the Court of Appeals or justice of the Supreme Court, the
names of those candidates must be omitted from all ballots for a
primary election and placed on all ballots for the general election.
(b) Any nonpartisan office, other than the office of judge of a
district court, judge of the Court of Appeals, justice of the Supreme
Court or member of a town advisory board, the names of those
candidates must appear on the ballot for a primary election unless
the candidates were nominated pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS
293.165. If a candidate receives one or more votes at the primary
election, the candidate must be declared elected to the office and his
or her name must not be placed on the ballot for the general
election. If a candidate does not receive one or more votes at the
primary election, his or her name must be placed on the ballot for
the general election.
(c) The office of member of a town advisory board, the
candidate must be declared elected to the office and no election
must be held for that office.
4. If there are not more than twice the number of candidates to
be elected to a nonpartisan office, the candidates must, without a
primary election, be declared the nominees for the office, and the
names of the candidates must be omitted from all ballots for a
primary election and placed on all ballots for the general election.
-
*SB74_R4*

– 20 –
5. If there are more than twice the number of candidates to be
elected to a nonpartisan office, the names of the candidates must
appear on the ballot for a primary election. Except as otherwise
provided in NRS 293.400, those candidates who receive the highest
number of votes at the primary election, not to exceed twice the
number to be elected, must be declared nominees for the office and
the names of those candidates must be placed on the ballot for the
general election, except that if one of those candidates receives a
majority of the votes cast in the primary election for:
(a) The office of judge of a district court, judge of the Court of
Appeals or justice of the Supreme Court, the candidate must be
declared the only nominee for the office and only his or her name
must be placed on the ballot for the general election.
(b) Any other nonpartisan office, the candidate must be declared
elected to the office and his or her name must not be placed on the
ballot for the general election.
 For the purposes of determining whether a candidate received a
majority of the votes cast in the primary election for a nonpartisan
office for which voters were authorized to select more than one
candidate, each ballot upon which a voter marked a valid choice
for one or more candidates for that office shall be deemed to be
one vote cast in the primary election for that office.
Sec. 9.5. NRS 293.267 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.267 1. Ballots for a general election must contain the
names of candidates who were nominated at the primary election,
the names of the candidates of a minor political party and the names
of independent candidates.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.2565, names of
candidates must be grouped alphabetically under the title and length
of term of the office for which those candidates filed.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4:
(a) Immediately following the name of each candidate for a
partisan office must appear the name or abbreviation of his or her
political party, the words [“no political party”] “Independent
Candidate” or the abbreviation [“NPP,”] “INC,” as the case may
be.
(b) Immediately following the name of each candidate for a
nonpartisan office must appear the word “nonpartisan” or the
abbreviation [“NP.”] “NPR.”
4. Where a system of voting other than by paper ballot is used,
the Secretary of State may provide for any placement of the name or
abbreviation of the political party, the words [“no political party”]
“Independent Candidate” or “nonpartisan” or the abbreviation
[“NPP”] “INC” or [“NP,”] “NPR,” as appropriate, which clearly
-
*SB74_R4*

– 21 –
relates the designation to the name of the candidate to whom it
applies.
5. If the Legislature rejects a statewide measure proposed by
initiative and proposes a different measure on the same subject
which the Governor approves, the measure proposed by the
Legislature and approved by the Governor must be listed on the
ballot before the statewide measure proposed by initiative. Each
ballot and sample ballot upon which the measures appear must
contain a statement that reads substantially as follows:

The following questions are alternative approaches to the
same issue, and only one approach may be enacted into law.
Please vote for only one.
Sec. 10. NRS 293.269 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.269 1. Every ballot upon which appears the names of
candidates for any statewide office or for President and Vice
President of the United States shall contain for each office an
additional line equivalent to the lines on which the candidates’
names appear and placed at the end of the group of lines containing
the names of the candidates for that office. Each additional line shall
contain a [square] space in which the voter may express a choice of
that line in the same manner as the voter would express a choice of a
candidate, and the line shall read “None of these candidates.”
2. Only votes cast for the named candidates shall be counted in
determining nomination or election to any statewide office or
presidential nominations or the selection of presidential electors, but
for each office the number of ballots on which the additional line
was chosen shall be listed following the names of the candidates and
the number of their votes in every posting, abstract and
proclamation of the results of the election.
3. Every sample ballot or other instruction to voters prescribed
or approved by the Secretary of State shall clearly explain that the
voter may mark the choice of the line “None of these candidates”
only if the voter has not voted for any candidate for the office.
Sec. 11. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 11.3. NRS 293.269911 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293.269911 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section,
the county clerk shall prepare and distribute to each active registered
voter in the county and each person who registers to vote or updates
his or her voter registration information not later than the 14 days
before the election a mail ballot for every election. The county clerk
shall make reasonable accommodations for the use of the mail ballot
by a person who is elderly or disabled, including, without limitation,
-
*SB74_R4*

– 22 –
by providing, upon request, the mail ballot in 12-point type to a
person who is elderly or disabled.
2. The county clerk shall allow a voter to elect not to receive a
mail ballot pursuant to this section by submitting to the county clerk
a written notice in the form prescribed by the county clerk which
must be received by the county clerk not later than 60 days before
the day of the election.
3. The county clerk shall not distribute a mail ballot to any
person who:
(a) Registers to vote for the election pursuant to the provisions
of NRS 293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive; or
(b) [Elects] Except as otherwise provided in section 1.6 of this
act, elects not to receive a mail ballot pursuant to subsection 2.
4. The mail ballot must include all offices, candidates and
measures upon which the voter is entitled to vote at the election.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2 and 3, the
mail ballot must be distributed to:
(a) Each active registered voter who:
(1) Resides within the State, not later than 20 days before the
election; and
(2) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (c), resides
outside the State, not later than 40 days before the election.
(b) Each active registered voter who registers to vote after the
dates set for distributing mail ballots pursuant to paragraph (a) but
who is eligible to receive a mail ballot pursuant to subsection 1, not
later than 13 days before the election.
(c) Each covered voter who is entitled to have a military-
overseas ballot transmitted pursuant to the provisions of chapter
293D of NRS or the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee
Voting Act, 52 U.S.C. §§ 20301 et seq., not later than the time
required by those provisions.
6. In the case of a special election where no candidate for
federal office will appear on the ballot, the mail ballot must be
distributed to each active registered voter not later than 15 days
before the special election.
7. Any untimely legal action which would prevent the mail
ballot from being distributed to any voter pursuant to this section is
moot and of no effect.
Sec. 11.5. NRS 293.269919 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293.269919 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a
person shall not mark and sign a mail ballot on behalf of a voter or
assist a voter to mark and sign a mail ballot pursuant to the
provisions of NRS 293.269911 to 293.269937, inclusive [.] , and
section 1.6 of this act.
-
*SB74_R4*

– 23 –
2. At the direction of a voter who has a physical disability, is at
least 65 years of age or is unable to read or write, a person may
mark and sign a mail ballot on behalf of the voter or assist the voter
to mark and sign a mail ballot pursuant to this section.
3. If a person marks and signs a mail ballot on behalf of a voter
pursuant to this section, the person must indicate next to his or her
signature that the mail ballot has been marked and signed on behalf
of the voter.
4. If a person assists a voter to mark and sign a mail ballot
pursuant to this section, the person or the voter must include on the
return envelope his or her name, address and signature.
Sec. 11.7. NRS 293.361 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.361 1. During the time a polling place for early voting is
open for voting, a person may not electioneer for or against any
candidate, measure or political party in or within 100 feet from the
entrance to the [voting area.] building or other structure in which
the polling place is located. During the time that a person detained
in a county or city jail may vote in the jail, a person may not
electioneer for or against any candidate, measure or political party in
or within 100 feet from the entrance of the [voting area of the] jail.
2. During the period of early voting, the county clerk shall
keep continuously posted:
(a) At the entrance to the room or area, as applicable, in which
the polling place for early voting is located a sign on which is
printed in large letters “Polling Place for Early Voting.”
(b) At the outer limits of the area within which electioneering is
prohibited, at least one sign on which is printed in large letters
“Distance Marker: No electioneering between this point and the
entrance to the polling place.” The county clerk shall ensure that any
sign posted pursuant to this paragraph is:
(1) At least 17 inches by 11 inches in size;
(2) Placed on a window or door of the polling place or a
freestanding sign; and
(3) Visible to a person approaching the outer limits of the
area within which electioneering is prohibited.
3. Ropes or other suitable objects may be used at the polling
place to ensure compliance with this section. Persons who are not
expressly permitted by law to be in a polling place must be excluded
from the polling place to the extent practicable.
4. Any person who willfully violates the provisions of this
section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
Sec. 12. NRS 293.363 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.363 1. [When] Mail ballots must be counted by the mail
ballot central counting board pursuant to NRS 293.269931.
-
*SB74_R4*

– 24 –
2. Ballots cast using a mechanical voting system must not be
counted before 7 a.m. on the day of the election. No results or copy
of the results may be posted pursuant to NRS 293.383 until the
polls are closed . [, the counting board shall prepare to count the
ballots voted.] The counting procedure must be public and , to the
extent practicable, continue without adjournment until completed.
[2. If the ballots are paper ballots, the counting board shall
prepare in the following manner:
(a) The container that holds the ballots or the ballot box must be
opened and the ballots contained therein counted by the counting
board and opened far enough to ascertain whether each ballot is
single. If two or more ballots are found folded together to present
the appearance of a single ballot, they must be laid aside until the
count of the ballots is completed. If a majority of the inspectors are
of the opinion that the ballots folded together were voted by one
person, the ballots must be rejected and placed in an envelope, upon
which must be written the reason for their rejection. The envelope
must be signed by the counting board officers and placed in the
container or ballot box after the count is completed.
(b) If the ballots in the container or box are found to exceed in
number the number of names as are indicated on the roster as having
voted, the ballots must be replaced in the container or box, and a
counting board officer, with his or her back turned to the container
or box, shall draw out a number of ballots equal to the excess. The
excess ballots must be marked on the back thereof with the words
“Excess ballots not counted.” The ballots when so marked must be
immediately sealed in an envelope and returned to the county clerk
with the other ballots rejected for any cause.
(c) When it has been ascertained that the number of ballots
agrees with the number of names of registered voters shown to have
voted, the board shall proceed to count. If there is a discrepancy
between the number of ballots and the number of voters, a record of
the discrepancy must be made.]
Sec. 13. NRS 293.3677 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.3677 1. When counting a vote in an election, if more
choices than permitted by the instructions for a ballot are marked for
any office or question, the vote for that office or question may not
be counted.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 1, in an election
in which a mechanical voting system is used whereby a vote is cast
by darkening a designated space on the ballot:
(a) A vote must be counted if a portion of the designated space
is darkened [or] by the voter, such a marking cannot be
conclusively determined to be made in error and there is [a writing
in] some indication of the [designated space, including, without
-
*SB74_R4*

– 25 –
limitation, a cross or check;] intent of the voter on the face of the
ballot; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (a), a writing or
other mark on the ballot, including, without limitation, a cross,
check, tear or scratch may not be counted as a vote.
3. The Secretary of State:
(a) May adopt regulations establishing additional uniform,
statewide standards, not inconsistent with this section, for counting
a vote cast by a method of voting described in subsection 2; and
(b) Shall adopt regulations establishing uniform, statewide
standards for counting a vote cast by each method of voting used in
this State that is not described in subsection 2, including, without
limitation, a vote cast on a mechanical recording device which
directly records the votes electronically.
Sec. 14. NRS 293.391 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.391 1. The voted ballots, rejected ballots, spoiled ballots,
challenge lists, records printed on paper of voted ballots collected
pursuant to NRS 293B.400, reports prepared pursuant to NRS
293.269937 and stubs of the ballots used, enclosed and sealed, must,
after canvass of the votes by the board of county commissioners, be
deposited in the vaults of the county clerk. The records of voted
ballots that are maintained in electronic form must, after canvass of
the votes by the board of county commissioners, be sealed and
deposited in the vaults of the county clerk. The tally lists collected
pursuant to this title must, after canvass of the votes by the board of
county commissioners, be deposited in the vaults of the county clerk
without being sealed. All materials described by this subsection
must be preserved for at least 22 months, and all such sealed
materials must be destroyed immediately after the preservation
period. A notice of the destruction must be published by the clerk in
at least one newspaper of general circulation in the county not less
than 2 weeks before the destruction.
2. Unused ballots, enclosed and sealed, must, after canvass of
the votes by the board of county commissioners, be deposited in the
vaults of the county clerk and preserved for at least the period
during which the election may be contested and adjudicated, after
which the unused ballots may be destroyed.
3. The rosters containing the signatures of those persons who
voted in the election and the tally lists deposited with the board of
county commissioners are subject to the inspection of any elector
who may wish to examine them at any time after their deposit with
the county clerk.
4. A contestant of an election may inspect all of the material
regarding that election which is preserved pursuant to subsection 1
or 2, except the voted ballots and records printed on paper of voted
-
*SB74_R4*

– 26 –
ballots collected pursuant to NRS 293B.400 which are deposited
with the county clerk.
5. The voted ballots and records printed on paper of voted
ballots collected pursuant to NRS 293B.400 which are deposited
with the county clerk are not subject to the inspection of anyone,
except in cases of a contested election, and then only by the judge,
body or board before whom the election is being contested, or by the
parties to the contest, jointly, pursuant to an order of such judge,
body or board.
6. All of the materials preserved pursuant to subsection 1
which are deposited with the county clerk are subject to inspection
in an election accuracy audit that is conducted in accordance with
the regulations adopted pursuant to NRS 293.394.
Sec. 15. NRS 293.394 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.394 1. The Secretary of State shall adopt regulations for
conducting [a risk-limiting] an election accuracy audit of an
election, which may include, without limitation:
(a) Procedures to conduct [a risk-limiting] an election accuracy
audit;
(b) Criteria for which elections must be audited; and
(c) Criteria to determine the scope of the [risk-limiting] election
accuracy audit.
2. In accordance with the regulations adopted by the Secretary
of State pursuant to this section, each county clerk shall conduct [a
risk-limiting] an election accuracy audit of the results of an
election.
3. As used in this section, [“risk-limiting] “election accuracy
audit” means an audit protocol that:
(a) Makes use of statistical principles and methods; and
(b) Is designed to limit the risk of certifying an incorrect
election outcome.
Sec. 16. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 17. NRS 293.504 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.504 1. The following offices shall serve as voter
registration agencies:
(a) Such offices that provide public assistance as are designated
by the Secretary of State;
(b) Each office that receives money from the State of Nevada to
provide services to persons with disabilities in this State;
(c) The offices of the Department of Motor Vehicles;
(d) The offices of the city and county clerks;
(e) Such other county and municipal facilities as a county clerk
or city clerk may designate pursuant to NRS 293.5035 or 293C.520,
as applicable;
(f) Recruitment offices of the United States Armed Forces;
-
*SB74_R4*

– 27 –
(g) Each office of an automatic voter registration agency; and
(h) Such other offices as the Secretary of State deems
appropriate.
2. Each voter registration agency shall:
(a) Post in a conspicuous place, in at least 12-point type,
instructions for preregistering and registering to vote;
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, distribute
applications to preregister or register to vote which may be returned
by mail with any application for services or assistance from the
agency or submitted for any other purpose and with each application
for recertification, renewal or change of address submitted to the
agency that relates to such services, assistance or other purpose;
(c) Provide the same amount of assistance to an applicant in
completing an application to preregister or register to vote as the
agency provides to a person completing any other forms for the
agency; and
(d) Accept completed applications to preregister or register to
vote.
3. A voter registration agency is not required to provide an
application to preregister or register to vote pursuant to paragraph
(b) of subsection 2 to a person who applies for or receives services
or assistance from the agency or submits an application for any
other purpose if the person affirmatively declines to preregister or
register to vote and submits to the agency a written form that meets
the requirements of 52 U.S.C. § 20506(a)(6). Information related to
the declination to preregister or register to vote may not be used for
any purpose other than voter registration.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and NRS
293.5727 and 293.5747, any application to preregister or register to
vote accepted by a voter registration agency must be transmitted to
the county clerk not later than 10 days after the application is
accepted. The applications must be forwarded daily during the 2
weeks immediately preceding the last day to register to vote by mail
pursuant to NRS 293.560 or 293C.527, as applicable. The county
clerk shall accept any application which is obtained from a voter
registration agency pursuant to this section and completed by the
last day to register to vote by mail pursuant to NRS 293.560 or
293C.527, as applicable, if the county clerk receives the application
not later than 5 days after that date.
5. A voter registration agency shall provide notice to a person
who submits an application to register to vote after the last day to
register to vote by mail for an election pursuant to NRS 293.560 or
293C.527 that to vote in the upcoming election, the person must
complete an application to register to vote by computer using the
system established by the Secretary of State pursuant to
-
*SB74_R4*

– 28 –
NRS 293.671 or in person pursuant to NRS 293.5772 to 293.5887,
inclusive.
6. The Secretary of State shall cooperate with the Secretary of
Defense to develop and carry out procedures to enable persons in
this State to apply to preregister or register to vote at recruitment
offices of the United States Armed Forces.
[6.] 7. Notwithstanding the provisions of NRS 293.5768 to
293.57699, inclusive, each automatic voter registration agency must
comply with the provisions of the National Voter Registration Act,
52 U.S.C. §§ 20501 et seq.
Sec. 18. NRS 293.518 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.518 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.5768 to
293.57699, inclusive, at the time a person preregisters or an elector
registers to vote, the person or elector must indicate:
(a) A political party affiliation; or
(b) That he or she is not affiliated with a political party.
 A person or an elector who indicates that he or she is
“independent” shall be deemed not affiliated with a political party.
2. If a person or an elector indicates that he or she is not
affiliated with a political party, or is independent, the county clerk
or field registrar of voters shall list the person’s or elector’s political
party as nonpartisan.
3. If a person or an elector indicates an affiliation with a major
political party or a minor political party that has filed a certificate of
existence with the Secretary of State, the county clerk or field
registrar of voters shall list the person’s or elector’s political party as
indicated by the person or elector.
4. If a person or an elector indicates an affiliation with a minor
political party that has not filed a certificate of existence with the
Secretary of State, the county clerk or field registrar of voters shall:
(a) List the person’s or elector’s political party as the party
indicated in the application to preregister or register to vote, as
applicable.
(b) When compiling data related to preregistration and voter
registration for the county, report the person’s or elector’s political
party as “other party.”
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, if a person or
an elector does not make any of the indications described in
subsection 1, the county clerk or field registrar of voters shall:
(a) List the person’s or elector’s political party as [nonpartisan;]
“no political party”; and
(b) Mail to the person or elector a notice setting forth that the
person has been preregistered or the elector has been registered to
vote, as applicable, as [a nonpartisan] “no political party” because
-
*SB74_R4*

– 29 –
he or she did not make any of the indications described in
subsection 1.
6. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, if a person
who is preregistered or registered to vote:
(a) Submits a new paper application to preregister or register to
vote; and
(b) Does not make any of the indications described in subsection
1 on the new paper application,
 the county clerk or field registrar of voters shall not change the
person’s existing political party affiliation that was established by
his or her prior application pursuant to this section and is listed in
the statewide voter registration list.
7. The provisions of subsection 6 do not apply to a voter who
registers to vote using the National Mail Voter Registration
Application promulgated by the United States Election Assistance
Commission pursuant to the National Voter Registration Act, 52
U.S.C. §§ 20501 et seq., as amended.
Sec. 19. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 20. NRS 293.530 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.530 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.541:
(a) County clerks may use any reliable and reasonable means
available to correct the portions of the statewide voter registration
list which are relevant to the county clerks and to determine whether
a registered voter’s current residence is other than that indicated on
the voter’s application to register to vote.
(b) A county clerk may, with the consent of the board of county
commissioners, make investigations of registration in the county by
census, by house-to-house canvass or by any other method.
(c) A county clerk shall cancel the registration of a voter
pursuant to this subsection if:
(1) The county clerk mails a written notice to the voter which
the United States Postal Service is required to forward;
(2) The county clerk mails a return postcard with the notice
which has a place for the voter to write his or her new address, is
addressed to the county clerk and has postage guaranteed;
(3) The voter does not respond;
(4) The voter’s registration information has not been updated
by an automatic voter registration agency pursuant to NRS 293.5768
to 293.57699, inclusive; and
(5) The voter does not appear to vote in an election before
the polls have closed in the second general election following the
date of the notice.
(d) For the purposes of this subsection, the date of the notice is
deemed to be 3 days after it is mailed.
(e) The county clerk shall maintain records of:
-
*SB74_R4*

– 30 –
(1) Any notice mailed pursuant to paragraph (c);
(2) Any response to such notice; and
(3) Whether a person to whom a notice is mailed appears to
vote in an election,
 for not less than 2 years after creation.
(f) The county clerk shall use any postcards which are returned
to correct the portions of the statewide voter registration list which
are relevant to the county clerk.
(g) If a voter fails to return the postcard mailed pursuant to
paragraph (c) within 30 days, the county clerk shall designate the
voter as inactive on the voter’s application to register to vote.
(h) The Secretary of State shall adopt regulations to prescribe
the method for maintaining a list of voters who have been
designated as inactive pursuant to paragraph (g).
(i) If:
(1) The name of a voter is added to the statewide voter
registration list pursuant to NRS 293.57693; or
(2) The voter registration information of a voter whose name
is on the statewide voter registration list is updated pursuant to
NRS 293.5752,
 the county clerk shall provide written notice of the addition or
change to the voter not later than 5 working days after the addition
or change is made. Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph,
the notice must be mailed to the current [residence] mailing address
of the voter. The county clerk may send the notice by electronic
mail if the voter confirms the validity of the electronic mail address
to which the notice will be sent by responding to a confirmation
inquiry sent to that electronic mail address. Such a confirmation
inquiry must be sent for each notice sent pursuant to this paragraph.
The notice required pursuant to this paragraph may be provided as
part of the notice mailed pursuant to NRS 293.57693.
(j) If, pursuant to NRS 293.5307, a county clerk receives
notice of a change of address of a resident of the county whose
name is on the statewide voter registration list, the county clerk
shall, in accordance with 52 U.S.C. § 20507:
(1) If the person moved to a new address within the same
county, correct the address of the resident in the statewide voter
registration list and mail a written notice to the current mailing
address of the voter not later than 5 working days after the change
is made; or
(2) If the person moved to a new address outside of the
county, mail a written notice to the current mailing address of the
voter not later than 5 working days after such notice is received.
2. A county clerk is not required to take any action pursuant to
this section in relation to a person who preregisters to vote until the
-
*SB74_R4*

– 31 –
person is deemed to be registered to vote pursuant to subsection 2 of
NRS 293.4855.
Sec. 21. NRS 293.5307 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.5307 If a county clerk enters into an agreement pursuant to
NRS 293.5303, the county clerk shall review each notice of a
change of address filed with the United States Postal Service by a
resident of the county and identify each resident who is a registered
voter and has moved to a new address. [Before removing or
correcting information in the statewide voter registration list, the]
The county clerk shall , in accordance with 52 U.S.C. § 20507,
mail a notice to each such registered voter and follow the procedures
set forth in NRS 293.530 [.] and 52 U.S.C. § 20507.
Sec. 22. NRS 293.5727 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.5727 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
Department of Motor Vehicles shall provide an application to
preregister or register to vote to each person who applies for the
issuance or renewal of any type of driver’s license or identification
card issued by the Department.
2. The county clerk shall use the applications to preregister or
register to vote which are signed and completed pursuant to
subsection 1 to preregister or register an applicant to vote or to
correct the preregistration or registration of the applicant, as
applicable. An application that is not signed must not be used to
preregister or register or correct the preregistration or registration of
the applicant.
3. For the purposes of this section, each employee specifically
authorized to do so by the Director of the Department may oversee
the completion of an application. The authorized employee shall
check the application for completeness and verify the information
required by the application. Each application must include a
duplicate copy or receipt to be retained by the applicant upon
completion of the form. The Department shall, except as otherwise
provided in this subsection, forward each application on a weekly
basis to the county clerk or, if applicable, to the registrar of voters of
the county in which the applicant resides. The applications must be
forwarded daily during the 2 weeks immediately preceding the last
day to register to vote by mail pursuant to NRS 293.560 or
293C.527, as applicable.
4. The Department [is] :
(a) Is not required to provide an application to register to vote
pursuant to subsection 1 to a person who declines to apply to
register to vote pursuant to this section and submits to the
Department a written form that meets the requirements of 52 U.S.C.
§ 20506(a)(6). Information related to the declination to apply to
-
*SB74_R4*

– 32 –
register to vote must not be used for any purpose other than voter
registration.
(b) Shall provide notice to a person who submits an
application to register to vote after the last day to register to vote
by mail in an election pursuant to NRS 293.560 or 293C.527 that
to vote in the upcoming election, the person must complete an
application to register to vote by computer using the system
established by the Secretary of State pursuant to NRS 293.671 or
in person pursuant to NRS 293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive.
5. The county clerk shall accept any application to:
(a) Preregister to vote at any time.
(b) Register to vote which is obtained from the Department of
Motor Vehicles pursuant to this section and completed by the last
day to register to vote by mail pursuant to NRS 293.560 or
293C.527, as applicable, if the county clerk receives the application
not later than 5 days after that date.
6. Upon receipt of an application, the county clerk or field
registrar of voters shall determine whether the application is
complete. If the county clerk or field registrar of voters determines
that the application is complete, he or she shall notify the applicant
and the applicant shall be deemed to be preregistered or registered
as of the date of the submission of the application. If the county
clerk or field registrar of voters determines that the application is not
complete, he or she shall notify the applicant of the additional
information required. The applicant shall be deemed to be
preregistered or registered as of the date of the initial submission of
the application if the additional information is provided within 15
days after the notice for the additional information is mailed. If the
applicant has not provided the additional information within 15 days
after the notice for the additional information is mailed, the
incomplete application is void. Any notification required by this
subsection must be given by mail at the mailing address on the
application not more than 7 working days after the determination is
made concerning whether the application is complete.
7. The county clerk shall use any form submitted to the
Department to correct information on a driver’s license or
identification card to correct information on a previous application
to preregister or register unless the person indicates on the form that
the correction is not to be used for the purposes of preregistration or
voter registration. The Department shall forward each such form to
the county clerk or, if applicable, to the registrar of voters of the
county in which the person resides in the same manner provided by
subsection 3 for applications to preregister or register to vote.
8. Upon receipt of a form to correct information, the county
clerk shall compare the information to that contained in the database
-
*SB74_R4*

– 33 –
created by the Secretary of State pursuant to NRS 293.675. The
county clerk shall correct the information to reflect any changes
indicated on the form. After making any changes, the county clerk
shall notify the person by mail that the records have been corrected.
9. The Secretary of State shall, with the approval of the
Director, adopt regulations to:
(a) Establish any procedure necessary to provide a person who
applies to preregister to vote or an elector who applies to register to
vote pursuant to this section the opportunity to do so;
(b) Prescribe the contents of any forms or applications which the
Department is required to distribute pursuant to this section; and
(c) Provide for the transfer of the completed applications of
preregistration or registration from the Department to the
appropriate county clerk.
Sec. 23. NRS 293.57688 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293.57688 1. An automatic voter registration agency is
required to electronically transmit the following information of a
person to the database created by the Secretary of State pursuant to
NRS 293.675 using the system established pursuant to
NRS 293.57686:
(a) An electronic facsimile of the signature of the person, if the
automatic voter registration agency is capable of recording, storing
and transmitting to the county clerk an electronic facsimile of the
signature of the person;
(b) The first or given name and the surname of the person;
(c) The address at which the person actually resides as set forth
in NRS 293.486 and, if different, the address at which the person
may receive mail, including, without limitation, a post office box or
general delivery;
(d) The date of birth of the person;
(e) At least one of the following:
(1) The number indicated on the person’s current and valid
driver’s license or identification card issued by the Department of
Motor Vehicles; or
(2) The last four digits of the person’s social security
number; and
(f) A description of the documentation presented to the
automatic voter registration agency that indicates the person is a
citizen of the United States.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.5768, the
automatic voter registration agency shall electronically transmit to
the database created by the Secretary of State pursuant to NRS
293.675 the information described in subsection 1:
-
*SB74_R4*

– 34 –
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), not later than
5 working days after collecting the information; and
(b) During the 2 weeks immediately preceding the fifth Sunday
preceding an election, not later than 1 working day after collecting
the information.
3. An automatic voter registration agency shall provide notice
to a person who submits an application to register to vote after the
last day to register to vote by mail for an election pursuant to NRS
293.560 or 293C.527 that to vote in the upcoming election, the
person must complete an application to register to vote by
computer using the system established by the Secretary of State
pursuant to NRS 293.671 or in person pursuant to NRS 293.5772
to 293.5887, inclusive.
Sec. 23.5. NRS 293.57693 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293.57693 1. Upon transmission of the information to the
database created by the Secretary of State pursuant to NRS 293.675
by an automatic voter registration agency, the county clerk shall
collate the information into an individual electronic document,
which shall be deemed an application to register to vote. The county
clerk shall review the voter registration information transmitted by
the automatic voter registration agency to determine whether the
person is eligible to register to vote in this State.
2. If the county clerk determines that a person is eligible to
vote, the person shall be deemed a registered voter. The person’s
name must appear on the statewide voter registration list and the
appropriate roster and the person must be provided all sample
ballots and other voter information provided to registered voters.
3. In addition to the requirements of subsection 2, the county
clerk shall immediately mail a notice to the current [residence]
mailing address of the person. The notice must be in the form
prescribed by the Secretary of State and include, without limitation:
(a) A space for the person to indicate a political party affiliation;
(b) A space for the person to affirmatively decline to apply to
register to vote or have his or her voter registration updated, as
applicable;
(c) A preaddressed return envelope with postage prepaid;
(d) A statement setting forth the qualifications to vote in this
State as provided by NRS 293.485 and that if the person does not
meet the qualifications to vote in this State, the person should return
the notice and affirmatively decline in writing to register to vote;
(e) A statement explaining that unless the person affirmatively
declines in writing to apply to register to vote or have his or her
voter registration information updated, as applicable, the person is
deemed to have consented to the transmission of information to the
-
*SB74_R4*

– 35 –
database created by the Secretary of State pursuant to NRS 293.675
by the automatic voter registration agency for the purpose of
registering the person to vote or updating the voter registration
information on the statewide voter registration list;
(f) A statement explaining that if the person affirmatively
declines in writing to apply to register to vote or to have his or her
voter registration information updated, as applicable, the county
clerk will remove the person from the statewide voter registration
list or revert the person’s information on the statewide voter
registration list to the information that was on the statewide voter
registration list before the automatic voter registration agency
transmitted the information, and the person shall be deemed to not
have registered to vote or updated his or her voter registration
information, as applicable;
(g) A statement setting forth the penalties for submitting a false
application to register to vote; and
(h) A statement that:
(1) Indicates a political party affiliation or indicates that the
person is not affiliated with a political party is voluntary;
(2) The person may indicate a political party affiliation on
the form provided by the county clerk in the notice; and
(3) The person will not be able to vote at a primary election,
presidential preference primary election or primary city election for
candidates for partisan offices of a major political party unless the
person updates his or her voter registration information to indicate a
major political party affiliation.
4. The county clerk may send the notice required pursuant to
subsection 3 by electronic mail if the person confirms the validity of
the electronic mail address to which the notice will be sent by
responding a confirmation inquiry sent to that electronic mail
address.
5. The failure or refusal of the person to acknowledge that he
or she has received the notice required by subsection 3 is not a
declination by the person to apply to register to vote or have his or
her voter registration information updated.
6. If the county clerk determines that a person is not eligible to
register to vote or if the voter affirmatively declines in writing to be
registered to vote or have his or her automatic voter registration
updated:
(a) It shall be deemed that the transmittal from the automatic
voter registration agency is not a completed voter registration
application;
(b) It shall be deemed that the person did not apply to register to
vote;
-
*SB74_R4*

– 36 –
(c) It shall be deemed that the transmission of the person’s
information by the automatic voter registration system was an
official authorized act;
(d) It shall be deemed that the person did not falsely claim
citizenship in order to register to vote unless the person
affirmatively claimed to be a citizen to the automatic voter
registration agency; and
(e) The county clerk must remove the person’s registration from
the database created by the Secretary of State pursuant to NRS
293.675 or revert the person’s information on the database to the
information that was on the database before the automatic voter
registration agency transmitted the information to the county clerk,
as applicable.
Sec. 24. NRS 293.5832 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.5832 1. After the close of registration for an election
pursuant to NRS 293.560 or 293C.527, a registered voter may
update his or her voter registration information, including, without
limitation, his or her name, address and party affiliation.
2. The county or city clerk shall authorize at least one of the
following methods for a registered voter to update his or her voter
registration information pursuant to this section:
(a) A paper application; or
(b) The system established by the Secretary of State pursuant to
NRS 293.671.
 If the county or city clerk authorizes the use of both methods, the
county or city clerk may limit the use of one method to
circumstances when the other method is not reasonably available.
3. In addition to the methods described in subsection 2, the
county or city clerk may authorize another method for a registered
voter to update his or her voter registration information at a
polling place during the period for early voting by personal
appearance and on election day.
4. If a registered voter updates his or her voter registration
information [pursuant to this section and applies to vote in the
election,] 14 or more days before the election, the county or city
clerk [may require the voter to cast a provisional ballot in the
election if any circumstances exist that give the county or city clerk
reasonable cause to believe that the use of a provisional ballot is
necessary to provide sufficient time to verify and determine whether
the voter is eligible to cast the ballot in the election based on his or
her updated voter registration information.
4.] shall send a mail ballot to the voter.
5. If a registered voter [casts a provisional ballot in] updates
his or her voter registration information less than 14 days before
the election [pursuant to this section, the provisional ballot is subject
-
*SB74_R4*

– 37 –
to final verification in accordance with the procedures that apply to
other provisional ballots cast in the election pursuant to NRS
293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive.] , the registered voter may vote
only in person:
(a) During the period for early voting, at any polling place for
early voting by personal appearance in the county or city, as
applicable, in which the elector is eligible to vote; or
(b) On the day of the election, at:
(1) A polling place established pursuant to NRS 293.3072
or 293C.3032 in the county or city, as applicable, in which the
elector is eligible to vote; or
(2) The polling place for his or her election precinct.
6. If a registered voter updates his or her voter registration
pursuant to this section and votes in person or by mail in the
election, all other provisions of this title apply to identifying the
voter and verifying the signature of the voter, including, without
limitation, NRS 293.269927, 293.2725, 293.277, 293.283, 293.285,
293.3075, 293C.26314, 293C.26327, 293C.270, 293C.272,
293C.275, 293C.3035 or 293C.3585, as applicable.
Sec. 24.3. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 24.7. NRS 293.780 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.780 1. A person who is entitled to vote shall not vote or
attempt to vote more than once at the same election. A person votes
more than once at the same election if he or she votes more than
once in the same primary election, presidential preference primary
election, general election, special election to recall a public officer
or special election in this State or if he or she votes in the same
primary election or general election in this State and at least one
other state. Any person who votes or attempts to vote twice at the
same election is guilty of a category D felony and shall be punished
as provided in NRS 193.130.
2. Notice of the provisions of subsection 1 must be given by
the county or city clerk as follows:
(a) Stated on all sample ballots distributed by mail or electronic
means;
(b) Posted in boldface type at each polling place; and
(c) Posted in boldface type at the office of the county or city
clerk.
Sec. 25. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 26. NRS 293.875 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.875 1. At least once each year, each county or city clerk
and all members of their staff whose duties include administering an
election must complete a training class on cybersecurity that is
approved by the Secretary of State.
-
*SB74_R4*

– 38 –
2. The Secretary of State shall adopt by regulation a cyber-
incident response plan for elections. Each county and city clerk
and other local election official is required to comply with the
requirements of the cyber-incident response plan. If any county or
city clerk or other local election official identifies or is informed of
a confirmed [attack] cyber-incident or attempted [attack] cyber-
incident on the security of an information system used by the
county or city clerk or other local election official, the county or city
clerk or other local election official shall [immediately] notify the
Secretary of State , the Governor and the Legislative Commission
regarding [such attack] the cyber-incident or attempted [attack.]
cyber-incident in accordance with the cyber-incident response
plan adopted by the Secretary of State pursuant to this subsection.
Sec. 27. NRS 293.908 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.908 1. The following persons may request that personal
information contained in the records of the Secretary of State or a
county or city clerk be kept confidential:
(a) Any justice or judge in this State.
(b) Any senior justice or senior judge in this State.
(c) Any court-appointed master in this State.
(d) Any clerk of a court, court administrator or court executive
officer in this State.
(e) Any county or city clerk or registrar of voters charged with
the powers and duties relating to elections and any deputy appointed
by such county or city clerk or registrar of voters in the elections
division of the county or city.
(f) Any peace officer or retired peace officer.
(g) Any prosecutor.
(h) Any state or county public defender.
(i) Any person employed by the Office of the Attorney General
who prosecutes or defends actions on behalf of the State of Nevada
or any agency in the Executive Department of the State
Government.
(j) Any person, including, without limitation, a social worker,
employed by this State or a political subdivision of this State who as
part of his or her normal job responsibilities:
(1) Interacts with the public; and
(2) Performs tasks related to child welfare services or child
protective services or tasks that expose the person to comparable
dangers.
(k) Any county manager in this State.
(l) Any inspector, officer or investigator employed by this State
or a political subdivision of this State designated by his or her
employer:
(1) Who possess specialized training in code enforcement;
-
*SB74_R4*

– 39 –
(2) Who, as part of his or her normal job responsibilities,
interacts with the public; and
(3) Whose primary duties are the performance of tasks
related to code enforcement.
(m) The spouse, domestic partner , elderly parent or minor child
of a person described in paragraphs (a) to (l), inclusive.
(n) The surviving spouse, domestic partner or minor child of a
person described in paragraphs (a) to (l), inclusive, who was killed
in the performance of his or her duties.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Child protective services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.042.
(b) “Child welfare services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.044.
(c) “Code enforcement” means the enforcement of laws,
ordinances or codes regulating public nuisances or the public health,
safety and welfare.
(d) “Elderly parent” means a natural parent, adoptive parent
or stepparent who is 60 years of age or older.
(e) “Peace officer” means:
(1) Any person upon whom some or all of the powers of a
peace officer are conferred pursuant to NRS 289.150 to 289.360,
inclusive; and
(2) Any person:
(I) Who resides in this State;
(II) Whose primary duties are to enforce the law; and
(III) Who is employed by a law enforcement agency of
the Federal Government, including, without limitation, a ranger for
the National Park Service and an agent employed by the Federal
Bureau of Investigation, Secret Service, United States Department
of Homeland Security or United States Department of the Treasury.
[(e)] (f) “Prosecutor” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 241A.030.
[(f)] (g) “Social worker” means any person licensed under
chapter 641B of NRS.
Sec. 27.5. NRS 293B.165 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293B.165 1. A test conducted in the manner prescribed in
subsections 1 and 2 of NRS 293B.155 must be conducted
immediately before the start of the official count of the ballots and
again within 24 hours after the official count of the ballots [.] is
completed, including the counting of the final ballot.
2. Such tests must be certified by the accuracy certification
board.
Sec. 28. (Deleted by amendment.)
-
*SB74_R4*

– 40 –
Sec. 28.3. Chapter 293C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. If an active registered voter who is eligible to receive a mail
ballot pursuant to NRS 293C.263, including, without limitation,
an active registered voter who has elected not to receive a mail
ballot pursuant to NRS 293C.263, is unable to access his or her
mail ballot or appear in person at the polls due to an emergency,
the voter may submit a request to the city clerk, not earlier
than the 46th day before an election and not later than the day
before the election, to receive a mail ballot.
2. Upon receiving a request pursuant to subsection 1, the city
clerk shall, after verifying the voter is eligible to receive a mail
ballot pursuant to NRS 293C.263 and has not already voted in the
election, distribute the mail ballot to the voter.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this section, all provisions
of this title relating to mail ballots apply to a mail ballot requested
and distributed pursuant to this section.
4. The Secretary of State shall adopt regulations to carry out
the provisions of this section.
5. For the purposes of this section, “emergency” means an
unforeseen circumstance which significantly impairs the ability of
an active registered voter to access his or her mail ballot or appear
in person at the polls, including, without limitation:
(a) An illness or disability resulting in confinement in a
hospital, sanatorium, dwelling or nursing home;
(b) A sudden hospitalization, serious illness or call away from
home; or
(c) Any other circumstance the Secretary of State determines
by regulation to constitute an emergency for the purposes of this
section.
Sec. 28.7. NRS 293C.110 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.110 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.5817
and 293C.263 to 293C.26337, inclusive, and section 28.3 of this
act, the conduct of any city election is under the control of the
governing body of the city, and it shall, by ordinance, provide for
the holding of the election, appoint the necessary election officers
and election boards and do all other things required to carry the
election into effect.
2. The governing body of the city may provide for the conduct
of early voting by personal appearance in a city election pursuant to
NRS 293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive, and 293C.355 to 293C.361,
inclusive.
-
*SB74_R4*

– 41 –
Sec. 29. NRS 293C.175 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293C.175 1. A primary city election must be held in each city
of population category one, and in each city of population category
two that has so provided by ordinance, on the second Tuesday in
June of each even-numbered year, at which time there must be
nominated candidates for offices to be voted for at the next general
city election.
2. A candidate for an office to be voted for at the primary or
general city election must file a declaration of candidacy with the
city clerk not earlier than:
(a) For the office of judge of a municipal court, the first Monday
in January of the year in which the applicable election is to be held
and not later than 5 p.m. on the second Friday after the first Monday
in January.
(b) For any other office, the first Monday in March of the year
in which the applicable election is to be held and not later than 5
p.m. on the second Friday after the first Monday in March.
3. At the time that a candidate files a declaration of candidacy,
the city clerk shall charge and collect from the candidate, and the
candidate must pay to the city clerk, a filing fee in an amount fixed
by the governing body of the city by ordinance or resolution. The
filing fees collected by the city clerk must be deposited to the credit
of the general fund of the city.
4. All candidates, except as otherwise provided in NRS
266.220, must be voted upon by the electors of the city at large.
5. If, in a primary city election held in a city of population
category one or two, one candidate receives a majority of votes cast
in that election for the office for which he or she is a candidate, the
candidate must be declared elected to the office and the candidate’s
name must not be placed on the ballot for the general city election.
If, in the primary city election, no candidate receives a majority of
votes cast in that election for the office for which he or she is a
candidate, the names of the two candidates receiving the highest
number of votes must be placed on the ballot for the general city
election. For the purposes of determining whether a candidate
received a majority of the votes cast in the primary city election for
an office upon which voters were authorized to select more than
one candidate, each ballot upon which a voter marked a valid
choice for one or more candidates for that office shall be deemed
to be one vote cast in the primary city election for that office.
Sec. 30. NRS 293C.195 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293C.195 A withdrawal of candidacy for a city office must be
in writing and presented to the city clerk by the candidate in person
within [2] 7 days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and holidays, after
the last day for filing a declaration of candidacy. If the withdrawal
-
*SB74_R4*

– 42 –
of candidacy is submitted in a timely manner pursuant to the
provisions of this section, the withdrawal shall be deemed effective
after the seventh day, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and holidays,
after the last day for filing.
Sec. 31. NRS 293C.222 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293C.222 1. The city clerk may appoint a pupil as a trainee
for the position of election board officer. To qualify for such an
appointment, the pupil must be:
(a) A United States citizen, a resident of Nevada and a resident
of the city in which the pupil serves;
(b) Enrolled in high school; and
(c) At the time of service, at least 16 years of age.
2. The city clerk may only appoint a pupil as a trainee if:
(a) The pupil is appointed without political party affiliation;
(b) The city clerk sends the pupil a certificate stating the date
and hours that the pupil will act as a trainee;
(c) At least 20 days before the election in which the pupil will
act as a trainee, the principal of the high school or the assigned
school counselor of the pupil receives the city clerk’s certificate and
a written request signed by the pupil’s parent or guardian to be
excused from school for the time specified in the certificate;
(d) The principal of the high school or the assigned school
counselor of the pupil approves the pupil’s request; and
(e) The pupil attends the training class required by
NRS 293B.260.
3. A pupil may be appointed as a trainee pursuant to this
section regardless of his or her affiliation with a political party
including, without limitation, any designation of party affiliation
on his or her application to preregister or register to vote.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the city
clerk may assign a trainee such duties as the city clerk deems
appropriate. The city clerk shall not require the trainee to perform
those duties later than 10 p.m., or any applicable curfew, whichever
is earlier.
[4.] 5. The city clerk may compensate a trainee for service at
the same rate fixed for election board officers generally.
Sec. 32. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 32.3. NRS 293C.263 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.263 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
city clerk shall prepare and distribute to each active registered voter
in the city and each person who registers to vote or updates his or
her voter registration information not later than the 14 days before
the election a mail ballot for every election. The city clerk shall
make reasonable accommodations for the use of the mail ballot by a
-
*SB74_R4*

– 43 –
person who is elderly or disabled, including, without limitation, by
providing, upon request, the mail ballot in 12-point type to a person
who is elderly or disabled.
2. The city clerk shall allow a voter to elect not to receive a
mail ballot pursuant to this section by submitting to the city clerk a
written notice in the form prescribed by the city clerk which must be
received by the city clerk not later than 60 days before the day of the
election.
3. The city clerk shall not distribute a mail ballot to any person
who:
(a) Registers to vote for the election pursuant to the provisions
of NRS 293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive; or
(b) [Elects] Except as otherwise provided in section 28.3 of this
act, elects not to receive a mail ballot pursuant to subsection 2.
4. The mail ballot must include all offices, candidates and
measures upon which the voter is entitled to vote at the election.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2 and 3, the
mail ballot must be distributed to:
(a) Each active registered voter who:
(1) Resides within the State, not later than 20 days before the
election; and
(2) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), resides
outside the State, not later than 40 days before the election.
(b) Each active registered voter who registers to vote after the
dates set for distributing mail ballots pursuant to paragraph (a) but
who is eligible to receive a mail ballot pursuant to subsection 1, not
later than 13 days before the election.
(c) Each covered voter who is entitled to have a military-
overseas ballot transmitted pursuant to the provisions of chapter
293D of NRS or the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee
Voting Act, 52 U.S.C. §§ 20301 et seq., not later than the time
required by those provisions.
6. In the case of a special election where no candidate for
federal office will appear on the ballot, the mail ballot must be
distributed to each active registered voter not later than 15 days
before the special election.
7. Any untimely legal action which would prevent the mail
ballot from being distributed to any voter pursuant to this section is
moot and of no effect.
Sec. 32.7. NRS 293C.26318 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.26318 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section,
a person shall not mark and sign a mail ballot on behalf of a voter or
assist a voter to mark and sign a mail ballot pursuant to the
-
*SB74_R4*

– 44 –
provisions of NRS 293C.263 to 293C.26337, inclusive [.] and
section 28.3 of this act.
2. At the direction of a voter who has a physical disability, is at
least 65 years of age or is unable to read or write, a person may
mark and sign a mail ballot on behalf of the voter or assist the voter
to mark and sign a mail ballot pursuant to this section.
3. If a person marks and signs a mail ballot on behalf of a voter
pursuant to this section, the person must indicate next to his or her
signature that the mail ballot has been marked and signed on behalf
of the voter.
4. If a person assists a voter to mark and sign a mail ballot
pursuant to this section, the person must include on the return
envelope his or her name, address and signature.
Sec. 33. NRS 293C.362 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293C.362 1. [When] Mail ballots must be counted by the
mail ballot central counting board pursuant to NRS 293C.26331.
2. Ballots cast using a mechanical voting system must not be
counted before 7 a.m. on the day of the election. No results or copy
of the results may be posted pursuant to NRS 293C.380 until the
polls are closed . [, the counting board shall prepare to count the
ballots voted.] The counting procedure must be public and , to the
extent practicable, continue without adjournment until completed.
[2. If the ballots are paper ballots, the counting board shall
prepare in the following manner:
(a) The container that holds the ballots or the ballot box must be
opened and the ballots contained therein counted by the counting
board and opened far enough to determine whether each ballot is
single. If two or more ballots are found folded together to present
the appearance of a single ballot, they must be laid aside until the
count of the ballots is completed. If a majority of the inspectors are
of the opinion that the ballots folded together were voted by one
person, the ballots must be rejected and placed in an envelope, upon
which must be written the reason for their rejection. The envelope
must be signed by the counting board officers and placed in the
container or ballot box after the count is completed.
(b) If the ballots in the container or box are found to exceed the
number of names as are indicated on the roster as having voted, the
ballots must be replaced in the container or box and a counting
board officer shall, with his or her back turned to the container or
box, draw out a number of ballots equal to the excess. The excess
ballots must be marked on the back thereof with the words “Excess
ballots not counted.” The ballots when so marked must be
immediately sealed in an envelope and returned to the city clerk
with the other ballots rejected for any cause.
-
*SB74_R4*

– 45 –
(c) When it has been determined that the number of ballots
agrees with the number of names of registered voters shown to have
voted, the board shall proceed to count. If there is a discrepancy
between the number of ballots and the number of voters, a record of
the discrepancy must be made.]
Sec. 34. NRS 293C.369 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293C.369 1. When counting a vote in an election, if more
choices than permitted by the instructions for a ballot are marked for
any office or question, the vote for that office or question may not
be counted.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 1, in an election
in which a mechanical voting system is used whereby a vote is cast
by darkening a designated space on the ballot:
(a) A vote must be counted if a portion of the designated space
is darkened [or] by the voter, such a marking cannot be
conclusively determined to be made in error and there is [a writing
in] some indication of the [designated space, including, without
limitation, a cross or check;] intent of the voter on the face of the
ballot; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (a), a writing or
other mark on the ballot, including, without limitation, a cross,
check, tear or scratch may not be counted as a vote.
3. The Secretary of State:
(a) May adopt regulations establishing additional uniform,
statewide standards, not inconsistent with this section, for counting
a vote cast by a method of voting described in subsection 2; and
(b) Shall adopt regulations establishing uniform, statewide
standards for counting a vote cast by each method of voting used in
this State that is not described in subsection 2, including, without
limitation, a vote cast on a mechanical recording device which
directly records the votes electronically.
Sec. 35. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 36. NRS 294A.100 is hereby amended to read as follows:
294A.100 1. A person shall not make or commit to make a
contribution or contributions to a candidate for any office, except a
federal office, in an amount which exceeds $5,000 for the primary
election, regardless of the number of candidates for the office, and
$5,000 for the general election, regardless of the number of
candidates for the office, during the period:
(a) Beginning January 1 of the year immediately following the
last general election for the office and ending December 31
immediately following the next general election for the office, if that
office is a state, district, county or township office; or
-
*SB74_R4*

– 46 –
(b) Beginning from 30 days after the last election for the office
and ending 30 days after the next general city election for the office,
if that office is a city office.
2. A candidate shall not accept a contribution or commitment
to make a contribution made in violation of subsection 1.
3. No contribution made, committed to be made or accepted
pursuant to this section to a candidate for a primary election , [or]
general election or special election other than a special election to
recall a public officer affects the limitations on the amount of
contributions that may be committed, contributed or accepted
pursuant to NRS 294A.115 for a special election to recall a public
officer.
4. A person who willfully violates any provision of this section
is guilty of a category E felony and shall be punished as provided in
NRS 193.130.
Sec. 37. NRS 298.055 is hereby amended to read as follows:
298.055 The Secretary of State shall submit the certificate of
ascertainment [submitted] to the Archivist of the United States
pursuant to 3 U.S.C. § [6] 5. The certificate of ascertainment must
include a statement that:
1. Each nominee for presidential elector shall serve as a
presidential elector unless a vacancy occurs in the position of
presidential elector held by that nominee for presidential elector
before the conclusion of the meeting of presidential electors held
pursuant to 3 U.S.C. § 7; and
2. If a person is appointed pursuant to NRS 298.065 to fill a
vacancy in a position of presidential elector, the Secretary of State
will submit an amended certificate of ascertainment to the Archivist.
Sec. 38. NRS 298.660 is hereby amended to read as follows:
298.660 1. If a person who is a qualified candidate to be a
major political party’s nominee for President of the United States
wants to appear on the ballot for a presidential preference primary
election that is held for the party, the person must, not earlier than
October 1 and not later than 5 p.m. on October 15 of the year
immediately preceding the presidential preference primary election,
file with the Secretary of State a declaration of candidacy . [in the
form prescribed by the Secretary of State.]
2. A declaration of candidacy required to be filed pursuant to
this section must be in substantially the following form:

DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY OF........ FOR NOMINEE FOR
PRESIDENT OF THE UNITED STATES

State of Nevada
-
*SB74_R4*

– 47 –
County of .........................

For the purpose of having my name placed on the official
ballot as a candidate for the................ Party nomination for
the office of President of the United States, I, the
undersigned........, do swear or affirm under penalty of
perjury that my telephone number is............, and the
address at which I receive mail, if different than my
residence, is.........; that I am registered as a member of
the................ Party; that I generally believe in and intend to
support the concepts found in the principles and policies of
that political party in the coming election; that I meet the
qualifications for this office set forth in Clause 5 of Section
1 of Article II of the Constitution of the United States; that
if nominated as a candidate of the................ Party at the
ensuing election, I will accept that nomination and not
withdraw; that I will not knowingly violate any election law
or any law defining and prohibiting corrupt and fraudulent
practices in campaigns and elections in this State; that I will
qualify for the office if elected thereto, including, but not
limited to, complying with any limitation prescribed by the
Constitution and laws of the United States concerning
the number of years or terms for which a person may hold
the office; that I understand that knowingly and willfully
filing a declaration of candidacy which contains a false
statement is a crime punishable as a gross misdemeanor;
and that I understand that my name will appear on all
ballots as designated in this declaration.

.............................................................
(Designation of name)

.............................................................
(Signature of candidate for office)

Subscribed and sworn to before me
this...... day of the month of...... of the year......

............................................................
Notary Public or other person
authorized to administer an oath

3. Any person who knowingly and willfully files a declaration
of candidacy which contains a false statement in violation of this
section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
-
*SB74_R4*

– 48 –
Sec. 39. NRS 298.670 is hereby amended to read as follows:
298.670 1. The Secretary of State shall forward to each
county clerk the name, party affiliation and mailing address of each
qualified candidate whose name must appear on the ballot for the
presidential preference primary election.
2. Immediately upon receipt by the county clerk of the list of
qualified candidates, the county clerk shall publish a notice of the
presidential preference primary election in a newspaper of general
circulation in the county once a week for 2 successive weeks. If no
such newspaper is published in the county, the publication may be
made in a newspaper of general circulation published in the nearest
Nevada county. The notice must contain:
(a) The date of the presidential preference primary election;
(b) The major political parties that have qualified candidates
who will be on the ballot at the presidential preference primary
election;
(c) The names of the qualified candidates who will be on the
ballot at the presidential preference primary election and the
major political party which each candidate is affiliated with;
(d) The location of the polling places in the county, including,
without limitation, polling places for early voting by personal
appearance; and
[(d)] (e) The hours during which the polling places in the
county will be open for voting during the period for early voting and
the day of the presidential preference primary election.
Sec. 40. NRS 247.540 is hereby amended to read as follows:
247.540 1. The following persons may request that the
personal information described in subsection 1, 2 or 3 of
NRS 247.520 that is contained in the records of a county recorder be
kept confidential:
(a) Any justice or judge in this State.
(b) Any senior justice or senior judge in this State.
(c) Any court-appointed master in this State.
(d) Any clerk of a court, court administrator or court executive
officer in this State.
(e) Any county or city clerk or registrar of voters charged with
the powers and duties relating to elections and any deputy appointed
by such county or city clerk or registrar of voters in the elections
division of the county or city.
(f) Any peace officer or retired peace officer.
(g) Any prosecutor.
(h) Any state or county public defender.
(i) Any person employed by the Office of the Attorney General
who prosecutes or defends actions on behalf of the State of Nevada
-
*SB74_R4*

– 49 –
or any agency in the Executive Department of the State
Government.
(j) Any person, including, without limitation, a social worker,
employed by this State or a political subdivision of this State who as
part of his or her normal job responsibilities:
(1) Interacts with the public; and
(2) Performs tasks related to child welfare services or child
protective services or tasks that expose the person to comparable
dangers.
(k) Any county manager in this State.
(l) Any inspector, officer or investigator employed by this State
or a political subdivision of this State designated by his or her
employer:
(1) Who possesses specialized training in code enforcement;
(2) Who, as part of his or her normal job responsibilities,
interacts with the public; and
(3) Whose primary duties are the performance of tasks
related to code enforcement.
(m) The spouse, domestic partner , elderly parent or minor child
of a person described in paragraphs (a) to (l), inclusive.
(n) The surviving spouse, domestic partner or minor child of a
person described in paragraphs (a) to (l), inclusive, who was killed
in the performance of his or her duties.
(o) Any person for whom a fictitious address has been issued
pursuant to NRS 217.462 to 217.471, inclusive.
2. Any nonprofit entity in this State that maintains a
confidential location for the purpose of providing shelter to victims
of domestic violence may request that the personal information
described in subsection 4 of NRS 247.520 that is contained in the
records of a county recorder be kept confidential.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Child protective services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.042.
(b) “Child welfare services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.044.
(c) “Code enforcement” means the enforcement of laws,
ordinances or codes regulating public nuisances or the public health,
safety and welfare.
(d) “Elderly parent” means a natural parent, adoptive parent
or stepparent who is 60 years of age or older.
(e) “Peace officer” means:
(1) Any person upon whom some or all of the powers of a
peace officer are conferred pursuant to NRS 289.150 to 289.360,
inclusive; and
(2) Any person:
-
*SB74_R4*

– 50 –
(I) Who resides in this State;
(II) Whose primary duties are to enforce the law; and
(III) Who is employed by a law enforcement agency of
the Federal Government, including, without limitation, a ranger for
the National Park Service and an agent employed by the Federal
Bureau of Investigation, Secret Service, United States Department
of Homeland Security or United States Department of the Treasury.
[(e)] (f) “Prosecutor” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 241A.030.
[(f)] (g) “Social worker” means any person licensed under
chapter 641B of NRS.
Sec. 41. NRS 250.140 is hereby amended to read as follows:
250.140 1. The following persons may request that personal
information described in subsection 1, 2 or 3 of NRS 250.120 that is
contained in the records of a county assessor be kept confidential:
(a) Any justice or judge in this State.
(b) Any senior justice or senior judge in this State.
(c) Any court-appointed master in this State.
(d) Any clerk of a court, court administrator or court executive
officer in this State.
(e) Any county or city clerk or registrar of voters charged with
the powers and duties relating to elections and any deputy appointed
by such county or city clerk or registrar of voters in the elections
division of the county or city.
(f) Any peace officer or retired peace officer.
(g) Any prosecutor.
(h) Any state or county public defender.
(i) Any person employed by the Office of the Attorney General
who prosecutes or defends actions on behalf of the State of Nevada
or any agency in the Executive Department of the State
Government.
(j) Any person, including, without limitation, a social worker,
employed by this State or a political subdivision of this State who as
part of his or her normal job responsibilities:
(1) Interacts with the public; and
(2) Performs tasks related to child welfare services or child
protective services or tasks that expose the person to comparable
dangers.
(k) Any county manager in this State.
(l) Any inspector, officer or investigator employed by this State
or a political subdivision of this State designated by his or her
employer:
(1) Who possesses specialized training in code enforcement;
(2) Who, as part of his or her normal job responsibilities,
interacts with the public; and
-
*SB74_R4*

– 51 –
(3) Whose primary duties are the performance of tasks
related to code enforcement.
(m) The spouse, domestic partner , elderly parent or minor child
of a person described in paragraphs (a) to (l), inclusive.
(n) The surviving spouse, domestic partner or minor child of a
person described in paragraphs (a) to (l), inclusive, who was killed
in the performance of his or her duties.
(o) Any person for whom a fictitious address has been issued
pursuant to NRS 217.462 to 217.471, inclusive.
2. Any nonprofit entity in this State that maintains a
confidential location for the purpose of providing shelter to victims
of domestic violence may request that the personal information
described in subsection 4 of NRS 250.120 that is contained in the
records of a county assessor be kept confidential.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Child protective services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.042.
(b) “Child welfare services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.044.
(c) “Code enforcement” means the enforcement of laws,
ordinances or codes regulating public nuisances or the public health,
safety and welfare.
(d) “Elderly parent” means a natural parent, adoptive parent
or stepparent who is 60 years of age or older.
(e) “Peace officer” means:
(1) Any person upon whom some or all of the powers of a
peace officer are conferred pursuant to NRS 289.150 to 289.360,
inclusive; and
(2) Any person:
(I) Who resides in this State;
(II) Whose primary duties are to enforce the law; and
(III) Who is employed by a law enforcement agency of
the Federal Government, including, without limitation, a ranger for
the National Park Service and an agent employed by the Federal
Bureau of Investigation, Secret Service, United States Department
of Homeland Security or United States Department of the Treasury.
[(e)] (f) “Prosecutor” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 241A.030.
[(f)] (g) “Social worker” means any person licensed under
chapter 641B of NRS.
Sec. 42. Section 5.010 of the Charter of Carson City, being
chapter 213, Statutes of Nevada 1969, as last amended by chapter
295, Statutes of Nevada 2015, at page 1481, is hereby amended to
read as follows:
Sec. 5.010 Primary election.
-
*SB74_R4*

– 52 –
1. A primary election must be held on the date fixed by
the election laws of this state for statewide elections, at which
time there must be nominated candidates for offices to be
voted for at the next general election.
2. A candidate for any office to be voted for at any
primary election must file a declaration of candidacy as
provided by the election laws of this state.
3. All candidates for the office of Mayor and Supervisor,
and candidates for the office of Municipal Judge if a third
department of the Municipal Court has been established, must
be voted upon by the registered voters of Carson City at large.
4. If only two persons file for a particular office, their
names must not appear on the primary ballot but their names
must be placed on the ballot for the general election.
5. If in the primary election one candidate receives a
majority of votes cast in that election for the office for which
he or she is a candidate, the candidate must be declared
elected to the office and his or her name must not be placed
on the ballot for the general election. If in the primary
election no candidate receives a majority of votes cast in that
election for the office for which he or she is a candidate, the
names of the two candidates receiving the highest numbers of
votes must be placed on the ballot for the general election.
For the purposes of determining whether a candidate
received a majority of the votes cast in the primary election
for an office for which voters were authorized to select more
than one candidate, each ballot upon which a voter marked
a valid choice for one or more candidates for that office
shall be deemed to be one vote cast in the primary election
for that office.
Sec. 43. Section 5.010 of the Charter of the City of Henderson,
being chapter 266, Statutes of Nevada 1971, as last amended by
chapters 350 and 558, Statutes of Nevada 2019, at pages 2179 and
3553, respectively, is hereby amended to read as follows:
Sec. 5.010 Primary municipal election.
1. A primary municipal election must be held:
(a) On the first Tuesday after the first Monday in April
2019; and
(b) Beginning in 2022, on the second Tuesday in June of
each even-numbered year,
 at which time there must be nominated candidates for
offices to be voted for at the next general municipal election.
2. A candidate for any office to be voted for at any
primary municipal election must file a declaration of
candidacy as provided by the election laws of this State.
-
*SB74_R4*

– 53 –
3. All candidates for elective office, other than
candidates for the office of Council Member, must be voted
upon by the registered voters of the City at large.
4. A candidate for the office of Council Member must be
voted upon only by the registered voters of the ward that he
or she seeks to represent.
5. If in the primary municipal election no candidate
receives a majority of votes cast in that election for the office
for which he or she is a candidate, the names of the two
candidates receiving the highest number of votes must be
placed on the ballot for the general municipal election. If in
the primary municipal election, regardless of the number of
candidates for an office, one candidate receives a majority of
votes cast in that election for the office for which he or she is
a candidate, he or she must be declared elected and no general
municipal election need be held for that office. Such
candidate shall enter upon his or her respective duties at:
(a) If the primary municipal election was held in 2019,
the second regular meeting of the City Council held in June
2019.
(b) If the primary municipal election was held on the
second Tuesday of June of an even-numbered year, the first
regular meeting of the City Council held in January of the
year following the primary municipal election.
6. For the purposes of determining whether a
candidate received a majority of the votes cast in the
primary municipal election for an office for which voters
were authorized to select more than one candidate, each
ballot upon which a voter marked a valid choice for one or
more candidates for that office shall be deemed to be one
vote cast in the primary municipal election for that office.
Sec. 44. Section 5.010 of the Charter of the City of Las Vegas,
being chapter 517, Statutes of Nevada 1983, as last amended by
chapter 558, Statutes of Nevada 2019, at page 3558, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 5.010 Primary municipal elections.
1. A primary municipal election must be held in the
City:
(a) On the first Tuesday after the first Monday in April
2019; and
(b) Beginning in 2022, on the second Tuesday in June of
each even-numbered year.
2. In the primary municipal elections:
-
*SB74_R4*

– 54 –
(a) The candidates for Council Member who are to be
nominated must be nominated and voted for separately
according to the respective wards.
(b) If the City Council has established an additional
department or departments of the Municipal Court pursuant to
section 4.010 and, as a result, more than one office of
Municipal Judge is to be filled at any election, the candidates
for those offices must be nominated and voted upon
separately according to the respective departments.
3. Each candidate for municipal office must file a
declaration of candidacy with the City Clerk. All filing fees
collected by the City Clerk must be paid into the City
Treasury.
4. If, in the primary municipal election, regardless of the
number of candidates for an office, one candidate receives a
majority of votes which are cast in that election for the office
for which he or she is a candidate, he or she must be declared
elected for the term which commences on the day of the first
regular meeting of the City Council next succeeding the
meeting at which the canvass of the returns is made, and no
general municipal election need be held for that office. If, in
the primary municipal election, no candidate receives a
majority of votes which are cast in that election for the office
for which he or she is a candidate, the names of the two
candidates who receive the highest number of votes must be
placed on the ballot for the general municipal election.
5. For the purposes of determining whether a
candidate received a majority of the votes cast in the
primary municipal election for an office for which voters
were authorized to select more than one candidate, each
ballot upon which a voter marked a valid choice for one or
more candidates for that office shall be deemed to be one
vote cast in the primary municipal election for that office.
Sec. 45. Section 5.020 of the Charter of the City of North Las
Vegas, being chapter 573, Statutes of Nevada 1971, as last amended
by chapter 558, Statutes of Nevada 2019, at page 3562, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 5.020 Primary municipal elections; declaration of
candidacy.
1. The City Council shall provide by ordinance for
candidates for elective office to declare their candidacy and
file the necessary documents. The seats for City Council
Members must be designated by the numbers one through
four, which numbers must correspond with the wards the
candidates for City Council Members will seek to represent.
-
*SB74_R4*

– 55 –
A candidate for the office of City Council Member shall
include in his or her declaration of candidacy the number of
the ward which he or she seeks to represent. Each candidate
for City Council must be designated as a candidate for the
City Council seat that corresponds with the ward that he or
she seeks to represent.
2. A primary municipal election must be held:
(a) On the Tuesday following the first Monday in April
2019; and
(b) Beginning in 2022, on the second Tuesday in June of
each even-numbered year.
3. In the primary municipal election:
(a) A candidate for the office of City Council Member
must be voted upon only by the registered voters of the ward
that he or she seeks to represent.
(b) Candidates for all other elective offices must be voted
upon by the registered voters of the City at large.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, after
the primary municipal election, the names of the two
candidates who receive the highest number of votes must be
placed on the ballot for the general municipal election.
5. If, regardless of the number of candidates for an
office, one candidate receives a majority of the total votes
cast for that office in the primary municipal election, he or
she must be declared elected to that office and no general
municipal election need be held for that office. For the
purposes of determining whether a candidate received a
majority of the votes cast in the primary municipal election
for an office for which voters were authorized to select more
than one candidate, each ballot upon which a voter marked
a valid choice for one or more candidates for that office
shall be deemed to be one vote cast in the primary municipal
election for that office.
Sec. 46. Section 5.020 of the Charter of the City of Sparks,
being chapter 470, Statutes of Nevada 1975, as last amended by
chapter 158, Statutes of Nevada 2021, at page 716, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 5.020 Primary elections.
1. At the primary election:
(a) Candidates for the offices of Mayor, City Attorney
and Municipal Judge must be voted upon by the registered
voters of the City at large.
(b) Candidates to represent a ward as a member of the
City Council must be voted upon by the registered voters of
the ward to be represented by them.
-
*SB74_R4*

– 56 –
2. If at 5 p.m. on the last day for filing a declaration of
candidacy:
(a) There is only one candidate who has filed for
nomination for an office, that candidate must be declared
elected to the office and no election may be held for that
office.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (a), not
more than twice the number of candidates to be elected have
filed for nomination for an office, the names of those
candidates must be omitted from all ballots for a primary
election and placed on all ballots for a general election.
(c) More than twice the number of candidates to be
elected have filed for nomination for an office, the names of
the candidates must be placed on the ballot for the primary
election.
3. If at the primary election:
(a) One candidate receives the majority of votes cast in
the election for the office for which he or she is a candidate,
he or she must be declared elected to the office and no
general election need be held for that office.
(b) No candidate receives the majority of votes cast in the
election for the office for which he or she is a candidate, the
names of the two candidates who receive the highest number
of votes must be placed on the ballot for the general election.
 For the purposes of determining whether a candidate
received a majority of the votes cast in the primary election
for an office for which voters were authorized to select more
than one candidate, each ballot upon which a voter marked
a valid choice for one or more candidates for that office
shall be deemed to be one vote cast in the primary election
for that office.
Sec. 46.5. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Contingency Account created by NRS 353.266
the sum of $200,000 for allocation by the Interim Finance
Committee to the Secretary of State to:
(a) Provide the training course required pursuant to NRS
293.2504, as amended by section 8.5 of this act, including, without
limitation, any costs for printing or shipping materials related to the
training; and
(b) Provide to or reimburse any deputy or employee of the
Secretary of State who attends the training course required by NRS
293.2504, as amended by section 8.5 of this act:
(1) The cost of the per diem allowance or the cost of meals
which are contracted for with a vendor that was procured through a
competitive bidding process;
-
*SB74_R4*

– 57 –
(2) Incidentals; and
(3) Travel expenses.
2. Money appropriated by subsection 1 may only be allocated
by the Interim Finance Committee upon submittal by the Secretary
of State of documentation of the costs.
3. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 47. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 48. NRS 293.365, 293.423, 293.490, 293.567, 293.810
and 293C.365 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 49. 1. This section and sections 47 and 48 of this act
become effective upon passage and approval.
2. Sections 1 to 46, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
3. Section 46.5 of this act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
LEADLINES OF REPEALED SECTIONS
293.365 Accounting for all paper ballots before counting of
votes begins.
293.423 Recount of ballots at hearing of contest.
293.490 Residence not lost upon removal from county or
precinct.
293.567 Number of registered voters in county to be
transmitted by county clerk to Secretary of State before certain
elections.
293.810 Preregistration or registration in more than one
county at one time.
-
*SB74_R4*

– 58 –
293C.365 Accounting for all paper ballots before counting
of votes begins.
H
-
*SB74_R4*